Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,248
Hydraulic brake fluids; requirements; violation; penalty.

In order to promote highway safety by providing the public with safe and efficient hydraulic fluids for motor vehicle braking systems, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell, offer to sell, or display for sale any hydraulic fluids for use in motor vehicle braking systems that do not equal or exceed the specifications for types SAE 70R1 or SAE 70R3 brake fluids as set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.116.

Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1963, c. 217, § 1, p. 689;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-7,123.06;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,172;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 344.